Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  ORS 131A.360, as  amended by section 1, chapter 23, Oregon Laws 2018, is amended
to read:
131A.360. (1) The provisions of  this section apply only to a forfeiting agency other than the
state, and apply only to forfeiture proceeds arising out of  prohibited conduct as described in ORS
131A.005 (12)(a), (b) and (c).
(2) If the forfeiting agency is not a county, the forfeiting agency shall enter into an  agreement,
under ORS chapter 190, with the county in which  the property was seized to provide a portion of
the forfeiture proceeds to the county.
(3) After entry of a judgment of forfeiture, a  forfeiting agency shall first pay from the forfeiture
proceeds the costs incurred by seizing and forfeiting agencies in investigating and  prosecuting the
case, including costs, disbursements and  attorney fees as defined in ORCP 68 A, special expenses
such as the provision of currency  for undercover law enforcement operations, the cost of disabling
a hidden compartment in a  motor vehicle and the expenses of maintaining the seized property. The
forfeiting agency may not pay expenditures made in connection with the  ordinary maintenance and
operation of a seizing or forfeiting agency under this subsection.
(4) After payment of costs under subsection (3) of this section, the forfeiting agency shall:
(a) Deduct an amount equal to five percent of the forfeiture proceeds and deposit that amount
in the Illegal Drug Cleanup Fund  established under ORS 475.495 for the purposes specified in ORS
475.495 (5) and (6);
(b) Deduct an amount equal to 2.5 percent of the forfeiture proceeds and deposit  that amount
in the Asset Forfeiture Oversight Account;
(c) Deduct an amount equal to 20 percent of the forfeiture proceeds and  deposit that amount in
the Oregon Criminal  Justice Commission Account established under ORS 137.662 for support for
specialty courts as defined in ORS 137.680;
(d) Deduct an amount equal to 10 percent of the forfeiture proceeds  and deposit that amount in
the Early Learning Division Fund established under ORS 326.435 for disbursement to  Relief Nursery
programs as defined in ORS 417.786; and
(e) Deduct an amount equal to 10 percent of the forfeiture proceeds and  deposit that amount in
[the Oregon 529 College Savings Plan Subaccount established under ORS 178.320 ] an account es-
tablished or designated by  the State Treasurer in the higher education qualified tuition
Enrolled House Bill 2286 (HB 2286-INTRO) Page 1
savings program of the Oregon 529 Savings Network  for  disbursement to the scholarship pro-
gram for children of public safety officers established under ORS 348.270.
(5) If the forfeiting agency  has entered into an agreement with a county under subsection (2)
of this section, after paying  costs under subsection (3) of this section and making the deductions
required by subsection (4) of this section,  the forfeiting agency shall pay the county the amounts
required by the agreement.
(6) After making all payments  and deductions required by subsections (3), (4) and (5) of this
section, the forfeiting agency may use the remaining forfeiture  proceeds, including amounts received
by a county under subsection (5) of this section or  by any other public body under an intergovern-
mental agreement entered into under ORS 131A.355, only for:
(a) The purchase  of equipment necessary for the enforcement of laws relating to the unlawful
delivery, distribution, manufacture or possession of controlled substances;
(b) Currency for undercover law enforcement operations;
(c) Drug awareness and drug education programs offered in middle schools and high schools;
(d) The  expenses of a forfeiting agency in operating joint narcotic operations with other for-
feiting agencies pursuant to the terms of an intergovernmental agreement,  including paying for
rental space, utilities and office equipment;
(e) Expenses of a district attorney in criminal prosecutions for unlawful  delivery, distribution,
manufacture or possession  of controlled substances, as determined through intergovernmental
agreement between the forfeiting agency and the district attorney;
(f) Drug treatment and programs that support drug treatment; and
(g) A CASA Volunteer Program as defined in ORS 184.489.
(7) Notwithstanding subsection (6) of this section, growing equipment and laboratory equipment
seized by  a forfeiting agency that was used, or intended for use, in the manufacturing of controlled
substances may be donated to  a public school, community college or institution of higher education.
(8) A forfeiting agency shall sell as much property  as may be needed to make the distributions
required by this section. Distributions  required under subsection (4) of this section must be made
once every three months and are due within 20 days of the end of each  quarter. No interest shall
accrue on amounts that are paid within the period specified by this subsection.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 131A.365, as  amended by section 2, chapter 23, Oregon Laws 2018, is amended
to read:
131A.365. (1) The provisions of  this section apply only when the forfeiting agency is the state,
and apply only to forfeiture proceeds  arising out of prohibited conduct as described in ORS 131A.005
(12)(a), (b) and (c).
(2) After entry of a judgment of forfeiture, a  forfeiting agency shall first pay from the forfeiture
proceeds the costs incurred by seizing and forfeiting agencies in investigating and  prosecuting the
case, including costs, disbursements and  attorney fees as defined in ORCP 68 A, special expenses
such as the provision of currency  for undercover law enforcement operations, the cost of disabling
a hidden compartment in a  motor vehicle and the expenses of maintaining the seized property. The
forfeiting agency may not pay expenditures made in connection with the  ordinary maintenance and
operation of a seizing  or forfeiting agency under this subsection. Any amount paid to or retained
by the Department of  Justice under this subsection shall be deposited in the Criminal Justice Re-
volving Account in the  State Treasury. Any amount paid to or retained by the Oregon State Police
under this subsection shall be deposited in the State Police Account.
(3) After payment of costs under subsection (2) of this section, the forfeiting agency shall:
(a) Deduct an amount equal to 10 percent of the forfeiture proceeds  and deposit that amount in
the Illegal Drug Cleanup Fund established under ORS 475.495 for  the purposes specified in ORS
475.495 (5) and (6);
(b) Deduct an amount  equal to three percent of the forfeiture proceeds, not to exceed $50,000
in a biennium, and deposit that amount in the Asset Forfeiture Oversight Account;
Enrolled House Bill 2286 (HB 2286-INTRO) Page 2
(c) Deduct an amount equal to 20 percent of the forfeiture proceeds and  deposit that amount in
the Oregon Criminal Justice Commission Account established under ORS 137.662 for  support for
specialty courts as defined in ORS 137.680;
(d) Deduct an amount equal to 10 percent of the forfeiture proceeds  and deposit that amount in
the Early Learning Division Fund established under ORS 326.435 for disbursement to  Relief Nursery
programs as defined in ORS 417.786; and
(e) Deduct an amount equal to 10 percent of the forfeiture proceeds and  deposit that amount in
[the Oregon 529 College Savings Plan Subaccount established under ORS 178.320 ] an account es-
tablished or designated by  the State Treasurer in the higher education qualified tuition
savings program of the Oregon 529 Savings Network  for  disbursement to the scholarship pro-
gram for children of public safety officers established under ORS 348.270.
(4) If the forfeiting agency has  entered into an intergovernmental agreement with another public
body under ORS 131A.355, or has entered into an  agreement with any other law enforcement agency
of the state relating to distribution of forfeiture proceeds, after  paying costs under subsection (2)
of this section and making the deductions required by subsection (3) of  this section, the forfeiting
agency shall pay an equitable portion of the forfeiture proceeds to  each agency participating in the
seizure or forfeiture as provided by the agreement.
(5) After making all payments  and deductions required by subsections (2), (3) and (4) of this
section, the forfeiting agency shall distribute the remaining forfeiture proceeds as follows:
(a) If no law enforcement agency other than the Department of Justice participated in the  sei-
zure or forfeiture, the remaining forfeiture proceeds, and forfeiture proceeds  received by the De-
partment of Justice under subsection (4) of  this section, shall be divided between the Criminal
Justice Revolving Account and the Special Crime and Forfeiture Account  according to the following
schedule:
(A) One hundred percent of the first $200,000  accumulated shall be deposited in the Criminal
Justice Revolving Account.
(B) Seventy-five percent of the next $200,000 shall  be deposited in the Criminal Justice Revolv-
ing Account and the balance in the Special Crime and Forfeiture Account.
(C) Fifty percent of the next $200,000 shall be deposited in the Criminal Justice Revolving Ac-
count and the balance in the Special Crime and Forfeiture Account.
(D) Twenty-five percent  of the next $200,000 shall be deposited in the Criminal Justice Revolving
Account and the balance in the Special Crime and Forfeiture Account.
(E) One hundred  percent of all additional sums shall be deposited in the Special Crime and
Forfeiture Account.
(b) If no law enforcement agency other than the Department of State Police participated in  the
seizure or forfeiture, the remaining proceeds, and proceeds received by the Department of State
Police under subsection (4) of this section,  shall be divided between the State Police Account and
the Special Crime and Forfeiture Account according to the following schedule:
(A) One hundred percent of the first $600,000 accumulated shall be deposited in the State  Police
Account.
(B) Seventy-five percent of the next $300,000 shall be  deposited in the State Police Account and
the balance in the Special Crime and Forfeiture Account.
(C) Fifty percent of the next $200,000 shall be  deposited in the State Police Account and the
balance in the Special Crime and Forfeiture Account.
(D) Twenty-five percent of the next $200,000 shall be deposited in the State  Police Account and
the balance in the Special Crime and Forfeiture Account.
(E) One hundred percent of all additional sums shall be deposited in the Special  Crime and
Forfeiture Account.
(6) Forfeiture proceeds distributed under subsection (5) of this section may be used only for:
(a) The purchase of equipment necessary for the enforcement of laws relating to  the unlawful
delivery, distribution, manufacture or possession of controlled substances;
(b) Currency for undercover law enforcement operations;
Enrolled House Bill 2286 (HB 2286-INTRO) Page 3
(c) Drug awareness  and drug education programs offered in middle schools and high schools; and
(d) The  expenses of a forfeiting agency in operating joint narcotic operations with other for-
feiting agencies pursuant to the terms of an intergovernmental agreement,  including paying for
rental space, utilities and office equipment.
(7) A forfeiting agency shall sell as much property  as may be needed to make the distributions
required by this section. Distributions required under subsection (3) of this  section must be made
once every three months and  are due within 20 days of the end of each quarter. No interest shall
accrue on amounts that are paid within the period specified by this subsection.
SECTION 3.  ORS 178.320, as amended by section 3, chapter 23, Oregon Laws 2018,  is amended
to read:
178.320. (1) The Oregon 529 Savings Network Fund is established in the State Treasury, separate
and distinct from the General Fund. The Oregon  529 Savings Network Fund shall consist of the
Oregon 529 College Savings  Plan Subaccount and the Oregon 529 ABLE Subaccount. Interest earned
by each subaccount shall be credited to the subaccount.
(2)(a) All moneys credited to the Oregon 529 College Savings  Plan Subaccount are continuously
appropriated to the Oregon 529 Savings Board for the purpose of  administering accounts established
for qualified higher education expenses under ORS 178.300 to 178.355.
(b) All moneys credited to the Oregon 529 ABLE Subaccount are continuously appropriated to
the board for the purpose of administering a qualified ABLE program pursuant to ORS 178.380.
(3) Each subaccount in the Oregon 529 Savings Network Fund shall consist of:
(a) Moneys appropriated to the subaccount by the Legislative Assembly;
(b) Moneys transferred to the subaccount  from the federal government, other state agencies or
local  governments;
(c) Moneys from the payment of fees and the payment of other moneys due the board;
(d) Any gifts or donations made to the State of Oregon for deposit in the subaccount; and
(e) Earnings on moneys in the subaccount.
(4)(a) The board may use the moneys in the Oregon 529 College Savings Plan Subaccount  to pay
the administrative  costs and expenses of the board and the Oregon 529 Savings Network related to
the administration of accounts established for qualified higher education expenses under ORS
178.300 to 178.355, to provide or make available  scholarships, grants and other incentives to account
owners, potential account owners and their designated beneficiaries[ , to pay for  scholarships
awarded under ORS 348.270 ] or to further any other purpose of ORS 178.300 to 178.355.
(b) The board may use the moneys in the Oregon 529 ABLE  Subaccount to pay the administra-
tive costs and expenses of the board and  the Oregon 529 Savings Network related to the adminis-
tration of the qualified ABLE program established under ORS  178.380, to provide or make available
incentives to owners of ABLE accounts or potential account owners and their designated benefici-
aries or to further any other purpose of the qualified ABLE program  established under ORS 178.380.
SECTION 4.
Notwithstanding the amendments to ORS 178.320 by section 3  of this 2019
Act, any moneys that were deposited in the Oregon 529 College  Savings Plan Subaccount for
disbursement to the scholarship program for children of public safety officers established
under ORS 348.270 before the effective date of this 2019 Act  shall be used to pay for schol-
arships awarded under ORS 348.270.
Enrolled House Bill 2286 (HB 2286-INTRO) Page 4
Passed by House April 3, 2019
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate April 29, 2019
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
..................................................................................
Bev Clarno, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 2286 (HB 2286-INTRO) Page 5